California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 informed of their right to counsel by the court and, if the person does not have an attorney for the proceedings, the court shall immediately appoint the public defender or other attorney to represent them. The person shall pay the cost for the legal services if the person is able to do so. At any judicial proceeding under this article, allegations that a person has a developmental disability and is dangerous to self or others, or as a result of an acute crisis, shall be presented by the district attorney for the county unless the board of supervisors, by ordinance or resolution, delegates this authority to the county counsel. The regional center shall inform the clients’ rights advocate, as described in Section 4433, when a petition is filed under this section and when a petition expires. The clients’ rights advocate for the regional center may attend any judicial proceedings to assist in protecting the individual’s rights.

(c) (1) An order of commitment made pursuant to this article with respect to a person described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505 shall expire automatically one year after the order of commitment is made. This section does not prohibit a party enumerated in Section 6502 from filing subsequent petitions for additional periods of commitment. If subsequent petitions are filed, the procedures followed shall be the same as with an initial petition for commitment.

(2) An order of commitment made pursuant to this article on or after July 1, 2012, with respect to the admission to a developmental center or state-operated community facility of a person described in paragraph (2), (4), or (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505 shall expire automatically six months after the earlier of the order of commitment pursuant to this section or the order of a placement in a developmental center pursuant to Section 6506, unless the
 regional center, prior to the expiration of the order of commitment, notifies the court in writing of the need for an extension. The required notice shall state facts demonstrating that the individual continues to be in acute crisis, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4418.7, and the justification for the requested extension, and shall be accompanied by the comprehensive assessment and plan described in subdivision (e) of Section 4418.7. An order granting an extension shall not extend the total period of commitment beyond one year, including a placement in a developmental center pursuant to Section 6506. If, prior to expiration of one year, the regional center notifies the court in writing of facts demonstrating that, due to circumstances beyond the regional center’s control, the placement cannot be made prior to expiration of the extension, and the court determines that good cause exists, the court may grant one further extension of up to 30 days. The court may also issue any orders
 the court deems appropriate to ensure that necessary steps are taken to ensure that the individual can be safely and appropriately transitioned to the community in a timely manner. The required notice shall state facts demonstrating that the regional center has made significant progress implementing the plan described in subdivision (e) of Section 4418.7 and that extraordinary circumstances exist beyond the regional center’s control that have prevented the plan’s implementation. This paragraph does not preclude the individual or a person acting on the person’s behalf from making a request for release pursuant to Section 4800, or counsel for the individual from filing a petition for habeas corpus pursuant to Section 4801. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 4801, for purposes of this paragraph, judicial review shall be in the superior court of the county that issued the order of commitment pursuant to this section.

(3) An order of
 commitment made pursuant to this article on or after January 1, 2020, with respect to the admission to an institution for mental disease, as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648, shall expire automatically six months after the earlier of the order of commitment pursuant to this section, the order of a placement in an institution for mental disease pursuant to Section 6506, or the date the regional center placed the individual in the institution for mental disease, unless the regional center notifies the court in writing of the need for an extension. The required notice shall state facts demonstrating that the individual continues to be in acute crisis, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4418.7, and the justification for the requested extension, and shall be accompanied by the comprehensive assessment and plan described in clause (v) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648. An order granting an extension shall
 not extend the total period of commitment beyond one year, including a placement in an institution for mental disease pursuant to Section 6506. If, prior to expiration of one year, the regional center notifies the court in writing of facts demonstrating that, due to circumstances beyond the regional center’s control, the placement cannot be made prior to expiration of the extension, and the court determines that good cause exists, the court may grant one further extension of up to 30 days. The court may also issue any orders the court deems appropriate in order for necessary steps to be taken to ensure that the individual can be safely and appropriately transitioned to the community in a timely manner. The required notice shall state facts demonstrating that the regional center has made significant progress implementing the plan described in clause (v) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648 and that extraordinary circumstances exist beyond the regional center’s control that
 have prevented the plan’s implementation. This paragraph does not preclude the individual or any person acting on their own behalf from making a request for release pursuant to Section 4800, or counsel for the individual from filing a petition for habeas corpus pursuant to Section 4801. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 4801, for purposes of this paragraph, judicial review shall be in the superior court of the county that issued the order of commitment pursuant to this section.

(4) An order of commitment made pursuant to this article on or after July 1, 2024, with respect to the admission to a completed and licensed complex needs home of a person described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505 shall expire automatically six months after the earlier of the order of commitment pursuant to this section or the order of a placement pursuant to
 Section 6506, unless the regional center, prior to the expiration of the order of commitment, notifies the court in writing of the need for an extension. The required notice shall state facts demonstrating that the individual continues to require placement in a complex needs home, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 4418.8, and the justification for the requested extension, and shall be accompanied by the comprehensive assessment and plan described in subdivision (e) of Section 4418.8. An order granting an extension shall not extend the total period of commitment beyond 18 months, except as provided for in subdivision (e) of Section 4418.8, including a placement pursuant to Section 6506. This paragraph does not preclude the individual or a person acting on the person’s behalf from making a request for release pursuant to Section 4800, or counsel for the individual from filing a petition for habeas corpus pursuant to Section 4801. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 4801, for
 purposes of this paragraph, judicial review shall be in the superior court of the county that issued the order of commitment pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 192, Sec. 10.   (SB 138)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.

If a person is charged with a violent felony, as described in Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, and the individual has been committed to the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code or Section 6500 for placement in a secure treatment facility, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code, the department shall give priority to placing the individual at Porterville Developmental Center prior to placing the individual at any other secure treatment facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 20.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6502.

A petition for the commitment of a person with a developmental disability to the State Department of Developmental Services who has been found incompetent to stand trial pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code when the defendant has been charged with one or more of the offenses identified or described in Section 6500, may be filed in the superior court of the county that determined the question of mental competence of the defendant. All other petitions may be filed in the county in which that person is physically present. A petition for the commitment of a person with a developmental disability to the State Department of Developmental Services who is in acute crisis, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d)
 of Section 4418.7, may be filed in the superior court of the county that determined the question of acute crisis or the county in which the acute crisis home is located. The following persons may request the person authorized to present allegations pursuant to Section 6500 to file a petition for commitment:

(a) The parent, guardian, conservator, or other person charged with the support of the person with a developmental disability.

(b) The probation officer.

(c) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.

(d) Any person designated for that purpose by the judge of the court.

(e) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and
 Rehabilitation.

(f) The regional center director or the director’s designee.

The request shall state the petitioner’s reasons for supposing the person to be eligible for admission thereto, and shall be verified by affidavit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 55.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6503.

The court shall fix a time and place for the hearing of the petition. The time for the hearing shall be set no more than 60 days after the filing of the petition. The court may grant a continuance only upon a showing of good cause. The hearing may, in the discretion of the court, be held at any place which the court deems proper, and which will give opportunity for the production and examination of witnesses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 859, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6504.

In all cases the court shall require due notice of the hearing of the petition to be given to the person alleged to have a developmental disability. Whenever a petition is filed, the court shall require such notice of the hearing of the petition as it deems proper to be given to any parent, guardian, conservator, or other person charged with the support of the person mentioned in the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 22.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6504.5.

(a) Wherever a petition is filed pursuant to this article, the court shall appoint the director of a regional center for the developmentally disabled established under Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500), or the designee of the director, to examine the person alleged to have a developmental disability.

(b) Within 15 judicial days after his or her appointment, the regional center director or designee shall submit to the court in writing a report containing his or her evaluation of the person alleged to have a developmental disability. If the person is an individual described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505, the report shall include the results of the assessment conducted pursuant to subdivision
 (b) of Section 4418.7. The report shall contain a recommendation of a facility or facilities in which the alleged developmentally disabled person may be placed. The report shall include any comprehensive assessment, or updated assessment, conducted by the regional center pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 4418.25.

(c) The report shall include a description of the least restrictive residential placement necessary to achieve the purposes of treatment. In determining the least restrictive residential placement, consideration shall be given to public safety. If placement into or out of a developmental center is recommended, the regional center director or designee simultaneously shall submit the report to the executive director of the developmental center or his or her designee. The executive director of the developmental center or his or her designee may, within 15 days of receiving the regional center report, submit to the
 court a written report evaluating the ability of the developmental center to achieve the purposes of treatment for this person and whether the developmental center placement can adequately provide the security measures or systems required to protect the public health and safety from the potential dangers posed by the person’s known behaviors.

(d) The reports prepared by the regional center director and developmental center director, if applicable, shall also address suitable interim placements for the person as provided for in Section 6506.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 30, Sec. 22.   (SB 856)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6505.

Whenever the court considers it necessary or advisable, it may cause an order to issue for the apprehension and delivery to the court of the person alleged to have a developmental disability, and may have the order executed by a peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 56.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6506.

Pending the hearing, the court may order that the alleged dangerous person alleged to have a developmental disability may be left in the charge of his or her parent, guardian, conservator, or other suitable person, or placed in a state developmental center, in the county psychiatric hospital, or in any other suitable placement as determined by the court. Prior to the issuance of an order under this section, the regional center and developmental center, if applicable, shall recommend to the court a suitable person or facility to care for the person alleged to have a developmental disability. The determination of a suitable person or facility shall be the least restrictive option that provides for the person’s treatment needs and that has existing security systems or
 measures in place to adequately protect the public safety from any known dangers posed by the person. In determining whether the public safety will be adequately protected, the court shall make the finding required by subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code.

Pending the hearing, the court may order that the person receive necessary habilitation, care, and treatment, including medical and dental treatment.

Orders made pursuant to this section shall expire at the time set for the hearing pursuant to Section 6503. If the court upon a showing of good cause grants a continuance of the hearing on the matter, it shall order that the person be detained pursuant to this section until the hearing on the petition is held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 24.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6507.

The court shall inquire into the condition or status of the person alleged to have a developmental disability. For this purpose it may by subpoena require the attendance before it of a physician who has made a special study of developmental disabilities and is qualified as a medical examiner, and of a clinical psychologist, or of two such physicians, or of two such psychologists, to examine the person and testify concerning his or her developmental disability. The court may also by subpoena require the attendance of such other persons as it deems advisable, to give evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 25.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6508.

Each psychologist and physician shall receive for each attendance mentioned in Section 6507 the sum of five dollars ($5) for each person examined, together with his necessary actual expenses occasioned thereby, and other witnesses shall receive for such attendance such fees and expenses as the court in its discretion allows, if any, not exceeding the fees and expenses allowed by law in other cases in the superior court.

Any fees or traveling expenses payable to a psychologist, physician, or witness as provided in this section and all expenses connected with the execution of any process under the provisions of this article, which are not paid by the parent, guardian, conservator, or person charged with the support of the person
 with the supposed developmental disability, shall be paid by the county treasurer of the county in which the person resides, upon the presentation to the treasurer of a certificate of the judge that the claimant is entitled thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 26.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6509.

(a) If the court finds that the person has a developmental disability, and is a danger to self or to others, or is in acute crisis, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4418.7, or in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 4418.8, the court may make an order that the person be committed to the State Department of Developmental Services for suitable treatment and habilitation services. For purposes of this section, “suitable treatment and habilitation services” means the least restrictive residential placement necessary to achieve the purposes of treatment. Care and treatment of a person committed to the State Department of Developmental Services may include placement in any of the following:

(1) A licensed community care facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, or a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, other than a developmental center or state-operated facility.

(2) A property used to provide Stabilization, Training, Assistance and Reintegration (STAR) services operated by the department if the person meets the criteria for admission pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505.

(3) The secure treatment program at Porterville Developmental Center, if the person meets the criteria for admission pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505.

(4) Canyon Springs Community Facility, if the person meets the criteria for admission pursuant to paragraph
 (4), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505.

(5) On or after July 1, 2019, the acute crisis center at Porterville Developmental Center, if the person meets the criteria for admission pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505.

(6) On or after July 1, 2024, upon completion and licensing, a complex needs home as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 4418.8, if the person meets the criteria for admission pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4418.8.

(7) Any other appropriate placement permitted by law.

(b) (1) The court shall hold a hearing as to the available placement alternatives and consider the reports of the regional center director or designee and the developmental center director or designee submitted pursuant to Section 6504.5. After hearing all the evidence, the court shall order that the person be committed to the placement that the court finds to be the most appropriate and least restrictive alternative. If the court finds that release of the person can be made subject to conditions that the court deems proper and adequate for the protection and safety of others and the welfare of the person, the person shall be released subject to those conditions.

(2) The court, however, may commit a person with a developmental disability who is not a resident of this state under Section 4460
 for the purpose of transportation of the person to the state of legal residence pursuant to Section 4461. The State Department of Developmental Services shall receive the person committed to it and shall place the person in the placement ordered by the court.

(c) If the person has at any time been found mentally incompetent pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code arising out of a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290 of the Penal Code, the court shall order the State Department of Developmental Services to give notice of that finding to the designated placement facility and the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction at the site of the placement facility.

(d) For persons residing in the secure treatment program at the Porterville Developmental Center, at the person’s annual
 individual program plan meeting the team shall determine if the person should be considered for transition from the secure treatment program to an alternative placement. If the team concludes that an alternative placement is appropriate, the regional center, in coordination with the developmental center, shall conduct a comprehensive assessment and develop a proposed plan to transition the individual from the secure treatment program to the community. The transition plan shall be based upon the individual’s needs, developed through the individual program plan process, and shall ensure that needed services and supports will be in place at the time the individual moves. Individual supports and services shall include, when appropriate for the individual, wrap-around services through intensive individualized support services. The clients’ rights advocate for the regional center shall be notified of the individual program plan meeting and may participate in the meeting unless the consumer objects on their own
 behalf. The individual’s transition plan shall be provided to the court as part of the notice required pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) If the State Department of Developmental Services decides that a change in placement is necessary, it shall notify, in writing, the court of commitment, the district attorney, the attorney of record for the person, and the regional center of its decision at least 15 days in advance of the proposed change in placement. The court may hold a hearing and either approve or disapprove of the change or take no action, in which case the change shall be deemed approved. At the request of the district attorney or of the attorney for the person, a hearing shall be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 192, Sec. 11.   (SB 138)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6510.

In case of the dismissal of the petition, the court may, if it considers the petition to have been filed with malicious intent, order the petitioner to pay the expenses in connection therewith, and may enforce such payment by such further orders as it deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

6510.5.

Under no circumstances shall the court order placement of a person described in this article or a dangerous person committed pursuant to Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code to a developmental center if the department has specifically notified the court in writing that the individual cannot be safely served in that developmental center.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 28.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6511.

Any person who knowingly contrives to have any person adjudged to have a developmental disability under the provisions of this article, unlawfully or improperly, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 29.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6512.

If, when a boy or girl is brought before a juvenile court under the juvenile court law, it appears to the court, either before or after adjudication, that the person has a developmental disability, or if, on the conviction of any person of a crime by any court, it appears to the court that the person has a developmental disability, the court may adjourn the proceedings or suspend the sentence, as the case may be, and direct some suitable person to take proceedings under this article against the person before the court, and the court may order that, pending the preparation, filing, and hearing of the petition, the person before the court be detained in a place of safety, or be placed under the guardianship of some suitable person, on his entering into a recognizance for
 the appearance of the person upon trial or under conviction when required. If, upon the hearing of the petition, or upon a subsequent hearing, the person upon trial or under conviction is not found to have a developmental disability, the court may proceed with the trial or impose sentence, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 30.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6513.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services shall pay for the costs, as defined in this section, of judicial proceedings, including commitment, placement, or release, under this article under both of the following conditions:

(1) The judicial proceedings are in a county where a state hospital or developmental center maintains a treatment program for persons with intellectual disabilities who are a danger to themselves or others.

(2) The judicial proceedings relate to a person with an intellectual disability who is at the time residing in the state hospital or developmental center located in the county of the
 proceedings.

(b) The appropriate financial officer or other designated official in a county described in subdivision (a) may prepare a statement of all costs incurred by the county in the investigation, preparation for, and conduct of the proceeding, including any costs of the district attorney or county counsel and any public defender or court-appointed counsel representing the person, and including any costs incurred by the county for the guarding or keeping of the person while away from the state hospital and for transportation of the person to and from the hospital. The statement shall be certified by a judge of the superior court and shall be sent to the State Department of Developmental Services. In lieu of sending statements after each proceeding, the statements may be held and submitted quarterly for the preceding three-month period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 57.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Juvenile Court Wards [6550. - 6552.]

6550.

If the juvenile court, after finding that the minor is a person described by Section 300, 601, or 602, is in doubt concerning the state of mental health or the mental condition of the person, the court may continue the hearing and proceed pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

6551.

(a) If the court is in doubt as to whether the person has a mental health disorder or an intellectual disability, the court shall order the person to be taken to a facility designated by the county and approved by the State Department of Health Care Services as a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation. Thereupon, Article 1 (commencing with Section 5150) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 applies, except that the professional person in charge of the facility shall make a written report to the court concerning the results of the evaluation of the person’s mental condition. If the professional person in charge of the facility finds the person is, as a result of a mental health disorder, in need of intensive treatment, the person may be certified for not more than 14 days of involuntary intensive treatment if the conditions
 set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 5250 and subdivision (b) of Section 5260 are complied with. Thereupon, Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 shall apply to the person. The person may be detained pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 5260), or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 5270.10), or Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) of Part 1 of Division 5 if that article applies.

(b) If the professional person in charge of the facility finds that the person has an intellectual disability, the juvenile court may direct the filing in any other court of a petition for the commitment of a minor as an intellectually disabled person to the State Department of Developmental Services for placement in a state hospital. In that case, the juvenile court shall transmit to the court in which the petition is filed a copy of the report of the professional person in charge of the facility in which the
 minor was placed for observation. The court in which the petition for commitment is filed may accept the report of the professional person in lieu of the appointment, or subpoenaing, and testimony of other expert witnesses appointed by the court, if the laws applicable to the commitment proceedings provide for the appointment by court of medical or other expert witnesses or may consider the report as evidence in addition to the testimony of medical or other expert witnesses.

(c) If the professional person in charge of the facility for 72-hour evaluation and treatment reports to the juvenile court that the minor is not affected with a mental health disorder requiring intensive treatment or an intellectual disability, the professional person in charge of the facility shall return the minor to the juvenile court on or before the expiration of the 72-hour period and the court shall proceed with the case in accordance with the Juvenile Court
 Law.

(d) Expenditure for the evaluation or intensive treatment of a minor under this section shall be considered an expenditure made under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of Division 5 and shall be reimbursed by the state as are other local expenditures pursuant to that part.

(e) The jurisdiction of the juvenile court over the minor shall be suspended during the time that the minor is subject to the jurisdiction of the court in which the petition for postcertification treatment of an imminently dangerous person or the petition for commitment of an intellectually disabled person is filed or under remand for 90 days for intensive treatment or commitment ordered by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 111.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6552.

A minor who has been declared to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court may, with the advice of counsel, make voluntary application for inpatient or outpatient mental health services in accordance with Section 5003. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 6000, Section 6002, or Section 6004, the juvenile court may authorize the minor to make the application if it is satisfied from the evidence before it that the minor is experiencing a mental disorder that may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by a course of treatment offered by the hospital, facility, or program in which the minor wishes to be placed, and that there is no other available hospital, program, or facility that might better serve the minor’s medical needs and best interest.
 The superintendent or person in charge of any state, county, or other hospital facility or program may then receive the minor as a voluntary patient. Applications and placements under this section shall be subject to the provisions and requirements of the Short-Doyle Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of Division 5), which are generally applicable to voluntary admissions. The juvenile court shall review the application for judicial authorization of the voluntary application for admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility pursuant to Section 361.23 or 727.13, as applicable.

If the minor is accepted as a voluntary patient, the juvenile court may issue an order to the minor and to the person in charge of the hospital, facility, or program in which the minor is to be placed that should the minor leave or demand to leave the care or custody thereof
 prior to the time they are discharged by the superintendent or person in charge, they shall be returned forthwith to the juvenile court for a further dispositional hearing pursuant to the juvenile court law.

The provisions of this section shall continue to apply to the minor until the termination or expiration of the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 61.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Sexually Violent Predators [6600. - 6609.3.]

6600.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “Sexually violent predator” means a person who has been convicted of a sexually violent offense against one or more victims and who has a diagnosed mental disorder that makes the person a danger to the health and safety of others in that it is likely that he or she will engage in sexually violent criminal behavior.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision any of the following shall be considered a conviction for a sexually violent offense:

(A) A prior or current conviction that resulted in a
 determinate prison sentence for an offense described in subdivision (b).

(B) A conviction for an offense described in subdivision (b) that was committed prior to July 1, 1977, and that resulted in an indeterminate prison sentence.

(C) A prior conviction in another jurisdiction for an offense that includes all of the elements of an offense described in subdivision (b).

(D) A conviction for an offense under a predecessor statute that includes all of the elements of an offense described in subdivision (b).

(E) A prior conviction for which the inmate received a grant of probation for an offense described in subdivision (b).

(F) A prior finding of not guilty by reason of insanity for an offense described in subdivision (b).

(G) A conviction resulting in a finding that the person was a mentally disordered sex offender.

(H) A prior conviction for an offense described in subdivision (b) for which the person was committed to the Division of Juvenile Facilities, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to Section 1731.5.

(I) A prior conviction for an offense described in subdivision (b) that resulted in an indeterminate prison sentence.

(3) Conviction of one or more of the crimes enumerated in this section
 shall constitute evidence that may support a court or jury determination that a person is a sexually violent predator, but shall not be the sole basis for the determination. The existence of any prior convictions may be shown with documentary evidence. The details underlying the commission of an offense that led to a prior conviction, including a predatory relationship with the victim, may be shown by documentary evidence, including, but not limited to, preliminary hearing transcripts, trial transcripts, probation and sentencing reports, and evaluations by the State Department of State Hospitals. Jurors shall be admonished that they may not find a person a sexually violent predator based on prior offenses absent relevant evidence of a currently diagnosed mental disorder that makes the person a danger to the health and safety of others in that it is likely that he or she will engage in sexually violent
 criminal behavior.

(4) The provisions of this section shall apply to any person against whom proceedings were initiated for commitment as a sexually violent predator on or after January 1, 1996.

(b) “Sexually violent offense” means the following acts when committed by force, violence, duress, menace, fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person, or threatening to retaliate in the future against the victim or any other person, and that are committed on, before, or after the effective date of this article and result in a conviction or a finding of not guilty by reason of insanity, as defined in subdivision (a): a felony violation of Section 261, 262, 264.1, 269, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289
 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code, or any felony violation of Section 207,
 209, or 220 of the Penal Code, committed with the intent to commit a violation of Section 261, 262, 264.1, 286, 287, 288, or 289 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code.

(c) “Diagnosed mental disorder” includes a congenital or acquired condition affecting the emotional or volitional capacity that predisposes the person to the commission of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting the person a menace to the health and safety of others.

(d) “Danger to the health and safety of others” does not require proof of a recent overt act while the offender is in custody.

(e) “Predatory” means an act is directed toward a stranger, a person of casual acquaintance with whom no substantial relationship exists, or an individual with whom a relationship has
 been established or promoted for the primary purpose of victimization.

(f) “Recent overt act” means any criminal act that manifests a likelihood that the actor may engage in sexually violent predatory criminal behavior.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and for purposes of this section, a prior juvenile adjudication of a sexually violent offense may constitute a prior conviction for which the person received a determinate term if all of the following apply:

(1) The juvenile was 16 years of age or older at the time he or
 she committed the prior offense.

(2) The prior offense is a sexually violent offense as specified in subdivision (b).

(3) The juvenile was adjudged a ward of the juvenile court within the meaning of Section 602 because of the person’s commission of the offense giving rise to the juvenile court adjudication.

(4) The juvenile was committed to the Division of Juvenile Facilities, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for the sexually violent offense.

(h) A minor adjudged a ward of the court for commission of an offense that is defined as a sexually violent offense shall be entitled to specific treatment as a sexual offender. The failure
 of a minor to receive that treatment shall not constitute a defense or bar to a determination that any person is a sexually violent predator within the meaning of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 128.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83 (The Sexual Predator Punishment and Control Act: Jessica's Law).)
-------------------------------------------

6600.05.
